New Jersey, session 221, A3383.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The State Treasurer shall establish a program providing grants as specified in subsection b. of this section to employers that were members of the Affiliated Physicians and Employers Master Trust during 2020 and 2021 and who were affected by the winding down of the Affiliated Physicians and Employers Master Trust.  The State Treasurer shall contact each employer that was a member of the Affiliated Physicians and Employers Master Trust during 2020 or 2021 and provide the employer with information about the program and an application to apply for a grant pursuant to this act. b.    An employer that was a member of the Affiliated Physicians and Employers Master Trust may apply to the State Treasurer for a grant pursuant to this act and the State Treasurer shall evaluate applications and make grants as appropriate.  No grant shall be awarded pursuant to this act after the end of the 24th month following the effective date of this act.  The State Treasurer shall evaluate applications from any employer that was a member of the Affiliated Physicians and Employers Master Trust during 2020 or 2021 that was required to pay an assessment due to liabilities of the Affiliated Physicians and Employers Master Trust.  The grant shall be limited to the amount of the assessment required to be paid by the employer. c.     Out of the amounts of federal government assistance provided to this State with regard to the coronavirus disease 2019 pandemic which may be available to address the public health and economic challenges that have contributed to the impact of the pandemic, there are allocated such amounts that are necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire 24 months following that date.